Maryland, session 2026, HB1575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1575*

HOUSE BILL 1575
8–805.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CIVIL IMMIGRATION VIOLATION” MEANS A VIOLATION OF
FEDERAL CIVIL IMMIGRATION LAW.
(3) “COURT ORDER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DOCUMENT ISSUED BY:
(I) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND
SECURITY;
(II) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE; OR
(III) ANY SUCCESSOR AGENCY.
(4) “JUDICIAL WARRANT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DOCUMENT ISSUED
BY:
(I) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND
SECURITY;
(II) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE; OR
(III) ANY SUCCESSOR AGENCY.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY MAY NOT, IN THE COURSE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S OR AGENT’S DUTIES:
(I) INQUIRE ABOUT OR INVESTIGATE AN INDIVIDUAL’S
CITIZENSHIP, IMMIGRATION STATUS, OR PLACE OF BIRTH;
(II) DETAIN OR PROLONG THE DETENTION OF AN INDIVIDUAL:
1. FOR THE PURPOSE OF INVESTIGATING THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS;
2. BASED ON THE SUSPICION THAT THE INDIVIDUAL HAS
COMMITTED A CIVIL IMMIGRATION VIOLATION; OR

HOUSE BILL 1575 3
3. AT THE REQUEST OF FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES UNLESS PRESENTED WITH A VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT;
(III) NOTIFY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL IS IN CUSTODY UNLESS REQUIRED BY A VALID COURT ORDER OR
JUDICIAL WARRANT;
(IV) TRANSFER AN INDIVIDUAL TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
AUTHORITIES UNLESS PRESENTED WITH A VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT; OR
(V) COERCE, INTIMIDATE, OR THREATEN AN INDIVIDUAL BASED
ON THE ACTUAL OR PERCEIVED CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS OF THE
INDIVIDUAL OR ANY OTHER PERSON.
(2) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL PREVENT AN EMPLOYEE OR
AGENT OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY FROM INQUIRING ABOUT
INFORMATION THAT IS MATERIAL TO A ROUTINE BOOKING PROCEDURE.
(3) IF THE CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
IS RELEVANT TO A PROTECTION ACCORDED TO THE INDIVIDUAL UNDER STATE OR
FEDERAL LAW, OR SUBJECT TO A REQUIREMENT IMPOSED BY INTERNATIONAL
TREATY, AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
MAY:
(I) NOTIFY THE INDIVIDUAL OF THE PROTECTION OR
REQUIREMENT; OR
(II) PROVIDE THE INDIVIDUAL WITH AN OPPORTUNITY TO
VOLUNTARILY DISCLOSE THE INDIVIDUAL’S CITIZENSHIP OR IMMIGRATION STATUS
FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECEIVING THE PROTECTION OR COMPLYING WITH THE
REQUIREMENT.
(C) UNLESS REQUIRED BY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW OR A COURT ORDER, AN
EMPLOYEE OR AGENT OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY MAY NOT:
(1) IN THE COURSE OF THE EMPLOYEE’S OR AGENT’S DUTIES,
PROVIDE INFORMATION TO FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES; OR
(2) ALLOW FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES TO ACCESS:
(I) AN AREA OF A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY
NOT ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC; OR

HOUSE BILL 1575
(II) RECORDS RELATING TO A STATE OR LOCAL CORRECTIONAL
FACILITY THAT ARE NOT ACCESSIBLE TO THE PUBLIC.
(D) (1) EACH STATE AND LOCAL CORRECTIONAL FACILITY SHALL ADOPT
A POLICY CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE POLICY REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE
PENALTIES FOR AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT WHO VIOLATES THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
(E) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN SUBJECTED TO A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR:
(1) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(2) PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(3) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF.
Article – Criminal Procedure
5–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Civil immigration violation” means a violation of federal civil
immigration law.
(3) “COURT ORDER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A DOCUMENT ISSUED BY:
(I) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF HOMELAND
SECURITY;
(II) THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE; OR
(III) ANY SUCCESSOR AGENCY.
[(3)] (4) “Family member” means a relative by blood, adoption, or
marriage.
[(4)] (5) “Household member” means a person who lives with another or
is a regular presence in the home of another.

HOUSE BILL 1575 5
[(5)] (6) (i) “Law enforcement agent” means an individual who is
certified by the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission under § 3–209 of the
Public Safety Article.
(ii) “Law enforcement agent” does not include an agent or employee
of a State correctional facility or a local correctional facility.
[(6)] (7) “Local correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of
the Correctional Services Article.
[(7)] (8) “State correctional facility” has the meaning stated in § 1–101 of
the Correctional Services Article.
(b) (1) In this subsection, “arrest” does not include a routine booking
procedure.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of this subsection, a law
enforcement agent may not, during the performance of regular police functions:
(i) inquire about an individual’s citizenship, immigration status, or
place of birth during a stop, a search, or an arrest;
(ii) detain, or prolong the detention of, an individual:
1. for the purpose of investigating the individual’s
citizenship or immigration status; or
2. based on the suspicion that the individual has committed
a civil immigration violation;
(iii) transfer an individual to federal immigration authorities unless
[required by federal law; or] PRESENTED WITH A VALID JUDICIAL WARRANT;
(iv) coerce, intimidate, or threaten any individual based on the actual
or perceived citizenship or immigration status of the individual or:
1. the individual’s family member;
2. the individual’s household member;
3. the individual’s legal guardian; or
4. another individual for whom the individual is a legal
guardian; OR

HOUSE BILL 1575
(V) NOTIFY FEDERAL IMMIGRATION AUTHORITIES THAT AN
INDIVIDUAL IS IN CUSTODY UNLESS REQUIRED BY A VALID COURT ORDER.
(3) Nothing in this subsection shall prevent a law enforcement agent from
inquiring about any information that is material to a criminal investigation.
(4) If the citizenship or immigration status of an individual is relevant to a
protection accorded to the individual under State or federal law, or subject to a requirement
imposed by international treaty, a law enforcement agent may:
(i) notify the individual of the protection or requirement; and
(ii) provide the individual an opportunity to voluntarily disclose the
individual’s citizenship or immigration status for the purpose of receiving the protection or
complying with the requirement.
(C) (1) EACH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY IN THE STATE SHALL ADOPT A
POLICY CONSISTENT WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE POLICY REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE
PENALTIES FOR AN EMPLOYEE OR AGENT WHO VIOLATES THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
(D) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN SUBJECTED TO A VIOLATION OF THIS
SECTION MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR:
(1) ACTUAL DAMAGES;
(2) PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(3) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.